Colorado, session 2026A, HB1358.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-2-146.6, amend (9)
as follows:
22-2-146.6. Colorado academic accelerator grant program -
report - rules - definitions - repeal.
(9) (a) For the 2023-24 budget year, the general assembly shall
appropriate twenty-four million five hundred thousand dollars to the
department. The department shall have HAS the authority to spend funds
APPROPRIATED FOR THE 2023-24 BUDGET YEAR continuously through the
2026-27 budget year for the purposes of this section. Any unexpended funds
that remain at the end of the 2026-27 budget year revert back to the general
fund.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) THIS SUBSECTION (9) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31,
2027.
SECTION 2. In Session Laws of Colorado 2023, amend section 15
introductory portion and section 15(b) of chapter 190 (HB 23-1231) as
follows:
Section 15. Appropriation. For the 2023-24 state fiscal year,
$26,694,530 $21,494,530 is appropriated to the department of education.
This appropriation is from the general fund. To implement this act, the
department may use this appropriation as follows:
(b) $24,500,000 $19,300,000 for the Colorado academic accelerator
grant program, which amount is based on an assumption that the department
will require an additional 2.6 FTE; and
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1358

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1358